Idaho, session 2025, H0457.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 36, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3622XX, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3622XX. ANIMAL ADOPTION AND RESCUE FEES. Any fee charged by a lo-
cal government or a nonprofit entity that has tax-exempt status under sec-
tion 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code for the adoption or rescue of an
animal is deemed a service fee and not the sale or use of tangible personal
property. Such adoption or rescue fees, which may include costs ordinarily
and necessarily incurred by the local government or nonprofit entity for the
care, feeding, housing, and transportation of such adopted or rescued ani-
mal, shall not be subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter and have never
been subject to such taxes.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.